Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1232.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 2 to the department of justice for the fiscal year beginning July 3 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 4 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 a. For the general office of attorney general for 7 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, 8 including the prosecuting attorneys training program, matching 9 funds for federal violence against women grant programs, 10 victim assistance grants, the office of drug control policy 11 prosecuting attorney program, and odometer fraud enforcement, 12 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 13 positions: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,539,176 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 234.00 16 As a condition of receiving the appropriation provided 17 in this lettered paragraph, the department of justice shall 18 maintain a record of the estimated time incurred representing 19 each agency or department. 20 The general office of attorney general may temporarily 21 exceed and draw more than the amount appropriated in this 22 lettered paragraph and incur a negative cash balance as long 23 as there are receivables equal to or greater than the negative 24 balances and the amount appropriated in this lettered paragraph 25 is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal year. 26 b. For victim assistance grants: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,016,708 28 The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph shall be 29 used to provide grants to care providers providing services to 30 crime victims of human trafficking, domestic abuse, rape, or 31 sexual assault. 32 The balance of the victim compensation fund established 33 in section 915.94 may be used to provide salary and support 34 of not more than 24.00 full-time equivalent positions and to 35 -1- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 1/ 19 S.F. _____ provide maintenance for the victim compensation functions 1 of the department of justice. In addition to the full-time 2 equivalent positions authorized pursuant to this paragraph, 3 7.00 full-time equivalent positions are authorized and shall 4 be used by the department of justice to employ one accountant 5 and four program planners. The department of justice may 6 employ the additional 7.00 full-time equivalent positions 7 authorized pursuant to this paragraph that are in excess of the 8 number of full-time equivalent positions authorized only if 9 the department of justice receives sufficient federal moneys 10 to maintain employment for the additional full-time equivalent 11 positions during the current fiscal year. The department 12 of justice shall only employ the additional 7.00 full-time 13 equivalent positions in succeeding fiscal years if sufficient 14 federal moneys are received during each of those succeeding 15 fiscal years. 16 The department of justice shall transfer at least $150,000 17 from the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 18 to the victim assistance grant program established in section 19 13.31. 20 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 21 lettered paragraph that remain unencumbered or unobligated at 22 the close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 23 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 24 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 25 c. For legal services for persons in poverty grants as 26 provided in section 13.34: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,634,601 28 d. To improve the department of justiceâs cybersecurity and 29 technology infrastructure: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 202,060 31 2. a. The department of justice, in submitting budget 32 estimates for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, pursuant 33 to section 8.23, shall include a report of funding from sources 34 other than amounts appropriated directly from the general fund 35 -2- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 2/ 19 S.F. _____ of the state to the department of justice or to the office of 1 consumer advocate. These funding sources shall include but 2 are not limited to reimbursements from other state agencies, 3 commissions, boards, or similar entities, and reimbursements 4 from special funds or internal accounts within the department 5 of justice. The department of justice shall also report actual 6 reimbursements for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, 7 and actual and expected reimbursements for the fiscal year 8 beginning July 1, 2025. 9 b. The department of justice shall include the report 10 required under paragraph âaâ, as well as information regarding 11 any revisions occurring as a result of reimbursements actually 12 received or expected at a later date, in a report to the 13 general assembly. The department of justice shall submit the 14 report on or before January 15, 2026. 15 3. a. The department of justice shall fully reimburse 16 the costs and necessary related expenses incurred by the Iowa 17 law enforcement academy to continue to employ one additional 18 instructor position who shall provide training for human 19 trafficking-related issues throughout the state. 20 b. The department of justice shall obtain the moneys 21 necessary to reimburse the Iowa law enforcement academy to 22 employ such an instructor from unrestricted moneys from either 23 the victim compensation fund established in section 915.94 or 24 the human trafficking victim fund established in section 915.95 25 or the human trafficking enforcement fund established in 2015 26 Iowa Acts, chapter 138, section 141. 27 Sec. 2. OFFICE OF CONSUMER ADVOCATE. There is appropriated 28 from the commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to 29 the office of consumer advocate of the department of justice 30 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 31 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 32 to be used for the purposes designated: 33 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 34 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 35 -3- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 3/ 19 S.F. _____ equivalent positions: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,763,937 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 18.00 3 The office of consumer advocate shall include in its charges 4 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 5 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 6 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 7 services. 8 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ FACILITIES. 9 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 10 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 11 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, 12 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 13 designated: 14 a. For the operation of the Fort Madison correctional 15 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 16 miscellaneous purposes: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 46,561,722 18 b. For the operation of the Anamosa correctional facility, 19 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 20 purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 39,358,974 22 c. For the operation of the Oakdale correctional facility, 23 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 58,954,020 26 d. For the Oakdale correctional facility for 27 department-wide institutional pharmaceuticals and miscellaneous 28 purposes: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,175,417 30 e. For the operation of the Newton correctional facility, 31 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 32 purposes: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 32,279,092 34 f. For the operation of the Mount Pleasant correctional 35 -4- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 4/ 19 S.F. _____ facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 1 miscellaneous purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 30,356,297 3 g. For the operation of the Rockwell City correctional 4 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 5 miscellaneous purposes: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,721,579 7 h. For the operation of the Clarinda correctional facility, 8 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 29,252,380 11 Moneys received by the department of corrections as 12 reimbursement for services provided to the Clarinda youth 13 corporation are appropriated to the department and shall be 14 used for the purpose of operating the Clarinda correctional 15 facility. 16 i. For the operation of the Mitchellville correctional 17 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 18 miscellaneous purposes: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 26,082,539 20 j. For the operation of the Fort Dodge correctional 21 facility, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 22 miscellaneous purposes: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 34,085,251 24 k. For reimbursement of counties for temporary confinement 25 of prisoners, as provided in sections 901.7, 904.908, and 26 906.17, and for offenders confined pursuant to section 904.513: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,345,319 28 l. For federal prison reimbursement, reimbursements for 29 out-of-state placements, and miscellaneous contracts: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 234,411 31 2. The department of corrections shall use moneys 32 appropriated in subsection 1 to continue to contract for the 33 services of a Muslim imam and a Native American spiritual 34 leader. 35 -5- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 5/ 19 S.F. _____ Sec. 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ ADMINISTRATION. 1 There is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 2 department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning July 3 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 4 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 5 designated: 6 1. For general administration, including salaries and the 7 adjustment of salaries throughout the department, support, 8 maintenance, employment of an education director to administer 9 a centralized education program for the correctional system, 10 and miscellaneous purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,165,695 12 a. It is the intent of the general assembly that each 13 lease negotiated by the department of corrections with a 14 private corporation for the purpose of providing private 15 industry employment of inmates in a correctional institution 16 shall prohibit the private corporation from utilizing inmate 17 labor for partisan political purposes for any person seeking 18 election to public office in this state and that a violation 19 of this requirement shall result in a termination of the lease 20 agreement. 21 b. It is the intent of the general assembly that as a 22 condition of receiving the appropriation provided in this 23 subsection the department of corrections shall not enter into 24 a lease or contractual agreement pursuant to section 904.809 25 with a private corporation for the use of building space for 26 the purpose of providing inmate employment without providing 27 that the terms of the lease or contract establish safeguards to 28 restrict, to the greatest extent feasible, access by inmates 29 working for the private corporation to personal identifying 30 information of citizens. 31 2. For educational programs for inmates at state penal 32 institutions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,108,109 34 a. To maximize the funding for educational programs, 35 -6- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 6/ 19 S.F. _____ the department shall establish guidelines and procedures to 1 prioritize the availability of educational and vocational 2 training for inmates based upon the goal of facilitating an 3 inmateâs successful release from the correctional institution. 4 b. The director of the department of corrections may 5 transfer moneys from Iowa prison industries and the canteen 6 operating funds established pursuant to section 904.310, for 7 use in educational programs for inmates. 8 c. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 9 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 10 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 11 available for expenditure for the purposes designated in this 12 subsection until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 13 3. For the development and operation of the Iowa corrections 14 offender network (ICON) data system: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 16 4. For offender mental health and substance abuse 17 treatment: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 28,065 19 5. For department-wide duties, including operations, costs, 20 and miscellaneous purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,905,778 22 Sec. 5. JUDICIAL DISTRICT DEPARTMENTS OF CORRECTIONAL 23 SERVICES. 24 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 25 to the department of corrections for the fiscal year beginning 26 July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, for salaries, support, 27 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, the following amounts, 28 or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 29 designated: 30 a. For the first judicial district department of 31 correctional services: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,301,981 33 It is the intent of the general assembly that the first 34 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 35 -7- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 7/ 19 S.F. _____ the drug courts operated by the district department. 1 b. For the second judicial district department of 2 correctional services: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 13,945,725 4 It is the intent of the general assembly that the second 5 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 6 two drug courts to be operated by the district department. 7 c. For the third judicial district department of 8 correctional services: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,915,376 10 d. For the fourth judicial district department of 11 correctional services: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,465,898 13 e. For the fifth judicial district department of 14 correctional services, including funding for electronic 15 monitoring devices for use on a statewide basis: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,006,813 17 It is the intent of the general assembly that the fifth 18 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 19 the drug court operated by the district department. 20 f. For the sixth judicial district department of 21 correctional services: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,406,811 23 It is the intent of the general assembly that the sixth 24 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 25 the drug court operated by the district department. 26 g. For the seventh judicial district department of 27 correctional services: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,003,457 29 It is the intent of the general assembly that the seventh 30 judicial district department of correctional services maintains 31 the drug court operated by the district department. 32 h. For the eighth judicial district department of 33 correctional services: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,241,148 35 -8- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 8/ 19 S.F. _____ 2. Each judicial district department of correctional 1 services, within the moneys available, shall continue programs 2 and plans established within that district to provide for 3 intensive supervision, sex offender treatment, diversion of 4 low-risk offenders to the least restrictive sanction available, 5 job development, and expanded use of intermediate criminal 6 sanctions. 7 3. Each judicial district department of correctional 8 services shall provide alternatives to prison consistent with 9 chapter 901B. The alternatives to prison shall ensure public 10 safety while providing maximum rehabilitation to the offender. 11 A judicial district department of correctional services may 12 also establish a day program. 13 4. The office of drug control policy of the department 14 of public safety shall consider federal grants made to the 15 department of corrections for the benefit of each of the eight 16 judicial district departments of correctional services as local 17 government grants, as defined pursuant to federal regulations. 18 5. The department of corrections shall continue to contract 19 with a judicial district department of correctional services to 20 provide for the rental of electronic monitoring equipment which 21 shall be available statewide. 22 6. The public safety assessment shall not be utilized in 23 pretrial hearings when determining whether to detain or release 24 a defendant before trial until such time the use of the public 25 safety assessment has been specifically authorized by the 26 general assembly. 27 Sec. 6. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS ââ REALLOCATION OF 28 APPROPRIATIONS. Notwithstanding section 8.39, within 29 the moneys appropriated in this Act to the department of 30 corrections, the department may reallocate the moneys 31 appropriated and allocated as necessary to best fulfill the 32 needs of the correctional institutions, administration of 33 the department, and the judicial district departments of 34 correctional services. However, in addition to complying with 35 -9- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 9/ 19 S.F. _____ the requirements of section 904.116 and providing notice to 1 the legislative services agency, the department of corrections 2 shall also provide notice to the department of management, 3 prior to the effective date of the revision or reallocation of 4 an appropriation made pursuant to this section. The department 5 of corrections shall not reallocate an appropriation or 6 allocation for the purpose of eliminating any program. 7 Sec. 7. INTENT ââ REPORTS. 8 1. The department of corrections, in cooperation with 9 townships, the Iowa cemetery associations, and other nonprofit 10 or governmental entities, may use inmate labor during the 11 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, to restore or preserve 12 rural cemeteries and historical landmarks. The department, in 13 cooperation with the counties, may also use inmate labor to 14 clean up roads, major water sources, and other water sources 15 around the state. 16 2. By January 15, 2026, the department shall provide an 17 annual status report regarding private-sector employment to 18 the general assembly. The report shall include the number 19 of offenders employed in the private sector, the combined 20 number of hours worked by the offenders, the total amount of 21 allowances, and the distribution of allowances pursuant to 22 section 904.702, including any moneys deposited in the general 23 fund of the state. 24 Sec. 8. ELECTRONIC MONITORING REPORT. The department of 25 corrections shall submit a report on electronic monitoring 26 to the general assembly by January 15, 2026. The report 27 shall specifically address the number of persons being 28 electronically monitored and break down the number of persons 29 being electronically monitored by offense committed. The 30 report shall also include a comparison of any data from the 31 prior fiscal year with the current fiscal year. 32 Sec. 9. STATE AGENCY PURCHASES FROM PRISON INDUSTRIES. 33 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 34 requires, âstate agencyâ means the government of the state 35 -10- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 10/ 19 S.F. _____ of Iowa, including but not limited to all executive branch 1 departments, agencies, boards, bureaus, and commissions, the 2 judicial branch, the general assembly and all legislative 3 agencies, institutions within the purview of the state board of 4 regents, and any corporation whose primary function is to act 5 as an instrumentality of the state. 6 2. State agencies are encouraged to purchase products from 7 Iowa state industries, as defined in section 904.802, when 8 purchases are required and the products are available from 9 Iowa state industries. State agencies shall obtain bids from 10 Iowa state industries for purchases of office furniture during 11 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, exceeding $5,000 or 12 in accordance with applicable administrative rules related to 13 purchases for the agency. 14 Sec. 10. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY. 15 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 16 state to the Iowa law enforcement academy for the fiscal year 17 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 18 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 19 purposes designated: 20 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 21 purposes, including jailer training and technical assistance, 22 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 23 positions: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,964,407 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 31.00 26 b. The Iowa law enforcement academy may temporarily exceed 27 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection 28 and incur a negative cash balance as long as there are 29 receivables equal to or greater than the negative balance and 30 the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded at 31 the close of the fiscal year. 32 2. The Iowa law enforcement academy may select at least 33 five automobiles of the department of public safety, division 34 of state patrol, prior to turning over the automobiles to 35 -11- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 11/ 19 S.F. _____ the department of administrative services to be disposed 1 of by public auction, and the Iowa law enforcement academy 2 may exchange any automobile owned by the academy for each 3 automobile selected if the selected automobile is used in 4 training law enforcement officers at the academy. However, any 5 automobile exchanged by the academy shall be substituted for 6 the selected vehicle of the department of public safety and 7 sold by public auction with the receipts being deposited in the 8 depreciation fund maintained pursuant to section 8A.365 to the 9 credit of the department of public safety, division of state 10 patrol. 11 3. The Iowa law enforcement academy shall provide training 12 for domestic abuse and human trafficking-related issues 13 throughout the state. The training shall be offered at no 14 cost to the attendees and the training shall not replace any 15 existing domestic abuse or human trafficking training offered 16 by the academy. 17 Sec. 11. STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER. 18 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 19 to the office of the state public defender of the department 20 of inspections, appeals, and licensing for the fiscal year 21 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 22 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 23 purposes designated: 24 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 25 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 26 equivalent positions: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 34,977,894 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 263.00 29 b. For payments on behalf of eligible adults and juveniles 30 from the indigent defense fund, in accordance with section 31 815.11: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 42,106,374 33 2. Moneys received by the office of the state public 34 defender pursuant to Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security 35 -12- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 12/ 19 S.F. _____ Act remaining unencumbered and unobligated at the end of the 1 fiscal year shall not revert but shall be transferred to the 2 Tit. IV-E juvenile justice improvement fund created in 2022 3 Iowa Acts, chapter 1146, section 11, subsection 3, to remain 4 available for expenditure by the office of the state public 5 defender in succeeding fiscal years for the purposes allowed by 6 Tit. IV-E of the federal Social Security Act. 7 Sec. 12. BOARD OF PAROLE. There is appropriated from the 8 general fund of the state to the board of parole for the fiscal 9 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 10 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 11 used for the purposes designated: 12 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 13 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 14 equivalent positions: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,545,114 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 11.00 17 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE. 18 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 19 state to the department of public defense, for the fiscal year 20 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 21 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 22 purposes designated: 23 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 25 equivalent positions: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,267,855 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 248.00 28 2. The department of public defense may temporarily exceed 29 and draw more than the amount appropriated in this section and 30 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 31 of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 32 and the amount appropriated in this section is not exceeded at 33 the close of the fiscal year. 34 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 35 -13- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 13/ 19 S.F. _____ MANAGEMENT. 1 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 2 to the department of homeland security and emergency management 3 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 4 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 5 to be used for the purposes designated: 6 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 8 equivalent positions: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,442,595 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 25.44 11 2. The department of homeland security and emergency 12 management may temporarily exceed and draw more than the amount 13 appropriated in this section and incur a negative cash balance 14 as long as there are receivables of federal funds equal to or 15 greater than the negative balance and the amount appropriated 16 in this section is not exceeded at the close of the fiscal 17 year. 18 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. There is appropriated 19 from the general fund of the state to the department of public 20 safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 21 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 22 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 23 1. For administrative functions, including salaries and the 24 adjustment of salaries throughout the department, the criminal 25 justice information system, and for not more than the following 26 full-time equivalent positions: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,195,906 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 48.00 29 2. For the division of criminal investigation, including 30 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 31 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 32 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 33 section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 34 are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements, 35 -14- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 14/ 19 S.F. _____ and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 1 positions: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 22,805,958 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 184.00 4 3. For the criminalistics laboratory fund created in 5 section 691.9: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 650,000 7 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 8 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 9 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 10 for expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 11 the succeeding fiscal year. 12 4. a. For the division of narcotics enforcement, including 13 the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ retirement, 14 accident, and disability system provided in chapter 97A in the 15 amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, as defined in 16 section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for which the moneys 17 are appropriated, to meet federal fund matching requirements, 18 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 19 positions: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,265,032 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 71.00 22 b. For the division of narcotics enforcement for undercover 23 purchases: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 209,042 25 5. For the division of state fire marshal, for fire 26 protection services as provided through the state fire service 27 and emergency response council as created in the department, 28 and for the stateâs contribution to the peace officersâ 29 retirement, accident, and disability system provided in chapter 30 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution rate, 31 as defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries for 32 which the moneys are appropriated, and for not more than the 33 following full-time equivalent positions: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,554,935 35 -15- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 15/ 19 S.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 21.00 1 6. For the division of state patrol, for salaries, support, 2 maintenance, workersâ compensation costs, and miscellaneous 3 purposes, including the stateâs contribution to the peace 4 officersâ retirement, accident, and disability system provided 5 in chapter 97A in the amount of the stateâs normal contribution 6 rate, as defined in section 97A.8, multiplied by the salaries 7 for which the moneys are appropriated, and for not more than 8 the following full-time equivalent positions: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 92,232,969 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 613.00 11 It is the intent of the general assembly that members of the 12 state patrol be assigned to patrol the highways and roads in 13 lieu of assignments for inspecting school buses for the school 14 districts. 15 7. For deposit in the sick leave benefits fund established 16 in section 80.42 for all departmental employees eligible to 17 receive benefits for accrued sick leave under the collective 18 bargaining agreement: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 279,517 20 8. For costs associated with the training and equipment 21 needs of volunteer fire fighters: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,075,520 23 Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in this 24 subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close 25 of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available 26 for expenditure for the purposes designated in this subsection 27 until the close of the succeeding fiscal year. 28 9. For the public safety interoperable and broadband 29 communications fund established in section 80.44: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 115,661 31 10. For the office to combat human trafficking established 32 pursuant to section 80.45, including salaries, support, 33 maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,742 35 -16- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 16/ 19 S.F. _____ 11. For department-wide duties, including operations, 1 costs, and miscellaneous purposes: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,058,666 3 12. For deposit in the public safety equipment fund 4 established in section 80.48 for the purchase, maintenance, and 5 replacement of equipment used by the department: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,750,000 7 13. For the office of drug control policy, for salaries, 8 support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, including 9 statewide coordination of the drug abuse resistance education 10 (D.A.R.E) programs or other similar programs, and for not more 11 than the following full-time equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 261,064 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.00 14 Notwithstanding section 8.39, the department of public 15 safety may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 16 as necessary to best fulfill the needs provided for in the 17 appropriation. However, the department shall not reallocate 18 moneys appropriated to the department in this section unless 19 notice of the reallocation is given to the legislative services 20 agency and the department of management prior to the effective 21 date of the reallocation. The notice shall include information 22 regarding the rationale for reallocating the moneys. The 23 department shall not reallocate moneys appropriated in this 24 section for the purpose of eliminating any program. 25 Sec. 16. GAMING ENFORCEMENT. 26 1. There is appropriated from the gaming enforcement 27 revolving fund created in section 80.43 to the department of 28 public safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 29 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 30 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 31 For any direct support costs for agents and officers of 32 the division of criminal investigationâs excursion gambling 33 boat, gambling structure, and racetrack enclosure enforcement 34 activities, including salaries, support, maintenance, and 35 -17- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 17/ 19 S.F. _____ miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 1 full-time equivalent positions: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,227,940 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 65.00 4 2. For each additional license to conduct gambling games on 5 an excursion gambling boat, gambling structure, or racetrack 6 enclosure issued during the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 7 there is appropriated from the gaming enforcement revolving 8 fund to the department of public safety for the fiscal year 9 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, an additional 10 amount of not more than $300,000 to be used for full-time 11 equivalent positions. 12 3. The department of public safety, with the approval of the 13 department of management, may employ no more than three special 14 agents for each additional riverboat or gambling structure 15 regulated after July 1, 2026, and three special agents for 16 each racing facility which becomes operational during the 17 fiscal year which begins July 1, 2026. Positions authorized 18 in this subsection are in addition to the full-time equivalent 19 positions otherwise authorized in this section. 20 Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY 21 MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated from the 911 emergency 22 communications fund created in section 34A.7A to the department 23 of homeland security and emergency management for the fiscal 24 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 25 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 26 used for the purposes designated: 27 For implementation, support, and maintenance of the 28 functions of the administrator and program manager under 29 chapter 34A and to employ the auditor of the state to perform 30 an annual audit of the 911 emergency communications fund: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 32 Sec. 18. CONSUMER EDUCATION AND LITIGATION ââ FARM 33 MEDIATION AND PROSECUTIONS, APPEALS, AND CLAIMS. 34 Notwithstanding section 714.16C , there is appropriated from the 35 -18- LSB 1005XC (3) 91 as/ns 18/ 19 S.F. _____ consumer education and litigation fund to the department of 1 justice for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 2 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 3 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 4 1. For farm mediation services as specified in section 5 13.13, subsection 2 : 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 300,000 7 2. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 8 purposes for criminal prosecutions, criminal appeals, and 9 performing duties pursuant to chapter 669 : 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 11